District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.01

Purpose; definitions.

(a)

(1)

Section 1-207.38 provides that the Council shall, by act, divide the District of Columbia into neighborhood commission areas and establish, for each such area, an Advisory Neighborhood Commission. Such § 1-207.38 was to be effective only if a majority of the qualified electors voting in the charter referendum voted for the establishment of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions.

(2)

In the charter referendum a majority of the qualified electors did vote to establish such Commissions, and it is the purpose of this part to implement the provisions of § 1-207.38.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Board” means the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics.

(2)

“Commission” means Advisory Neighborhood Commission.

(3)

“Emergency” means an action taken to immediately preserve the public peace, health, safety, welfare, or morals pursuant to § 2-505(c).

(4)

“Gender identity or expression” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1401.02(12A).

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 2, 22 DCR 2065
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 4, 22 DCR 2472
Sept. 20, 1977, D.C. Law 2-16, § 2(a), 24 DCR 3336
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-111, § 2(a), 31 DCR 3952
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-203, § 3(a), 37 DCR 8420
Jun. 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-135, § 2(a), 47 DCR 2741
June 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-177, § 2(a), 55 DCR 3696
Criminal justice supervisory board, authority to promulgate rules of procedure, see § 3-904.
1981 Ed., § 1-252.
1973 Ed., § 1-171a.
D.C. Law 13-135 added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 17-177, in subsec. (c), added par. (4).